data/hungarian.aff
PFX ! Y 27
PFX !   0    ötven        .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    öt           .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    több         .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    tíz          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    trillió      .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    száz         .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    sok          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    négy         .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    nyolcvan     .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    nyolc        .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    negyven      .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    millió       .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    milliárd     .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    két          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    kilencven    .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    kilenc       .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    húsz         .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    hét          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    három        .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    hetven       .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    hatvan       .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    hat          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    harminc      .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    fél          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    ezer         .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    egy          .                         [adj_num] %
PFX !   0    billió       .                         [adj_num] %
