data/hungarian.dic
ötödik/!VÓn×Lla	öt[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
ötöd/WÔŘÝMmRTtaz!	öt[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
ötvenedik/!VÓn×Ll	ötven[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
ötvened/VÓn×LlRTtz!	ötven[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
trilliomodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ	trillió[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
trilliomod/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	trillió[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
tizedik/!VÓn×Ll	tíz[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
tized/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!	tíz[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
tized/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!	[noun]{+[NOM]}
századik/mŇŮAU!ÖKk	száz[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
század/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQSsYcˇťkAz!	száz[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
század/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQSsYcˇťkAz!	[noun]{+[NOM]}
nyolcvanadik/!AUÖmŇŮKk	nyolcvan[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
nyolcvanad/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	nyolcvan[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
nyolcadik/!AUÖmŇŮKka	nyolc[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
nyolcad/AUÖmŇKkQSsaz!	nyolc[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
negyvenedik/!VÓn×Ll	negyven[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
negyvened/VÓn×LlRTtz!	negyven[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
negyedik/!VÓn×Lla	négy[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
negyed/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRaz!	négy[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
negyed/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRaz!	[noun]{+[NOM]}
milliárdodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ	milliárd[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
milliárdod/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	milliárd[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
milliomodik/!AUÖmŇŮKk	millió[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
milliomod/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	millió[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
kilencvenedik/!VÓn×Ll	kilencven[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
kilencvened/VÓn×LlRTtz!	kilencven[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
kilencedik/!VÓn×Lla	kilenc[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
kilenced/VÓn×LlRTtaz!	kilenc[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
kettedik/!VÓn×Lla	kettő[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
ketted/VÓn×LlRTtaz!	kettő[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
huszadik/!AUÖmŇŮKk	húsz[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
huszad/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	húsz[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
hetvenedik/!VÓn×Ll	hetven[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
hetvened/VÓn×LlRTtz!	hetven[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
heti/BGVxĐŐÓ!	hét[noun]+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
heti/BGVxĐŐÓ!	[adj]
hetedik/!VÓn×Lla	hét[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
heted/VÓn×LlRTtaz!	hét[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
havi/AFUxĎŐŇ!	hó[noun]+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
havi/AFUxĎŐŇ!	[adj]
hatvanadik/!AUÖmŇŮKk	hatvan[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
hatvanad/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	hatvan[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
hatodik/!AUÖmŇŮKka	hat[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
hatod/AUÖmŇKkQSsaz!	hat[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
harmincadik/!AUÖmŇŮKk	harminc[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
harmincad/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	harminc[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
harmadik/!AUÖmŇŮKka	három[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
harmad/AUÖmŇKkQSsaz!	három[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
felől/!	[post]
felől/!	[adv]
ezredik/nÓ×BVb!Ll	ezer[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
ezred/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!Bb	ezer[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
ezred/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!Bb	[noun]{+[NOM]}
billiárdod/AUÖmŇKkQSsz!	billiárd[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
billiomodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ	billió[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
